Utah statutes.
58-68-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by division rule.

(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall show compliance with:

(a)  continuing education renewal requirements; and

(b)  the requirement for designation of a contact person and alternate contact person for access to medical records and notice to patients as required by Subsections 58-68-304(1)(b) and (c).

(3)  Each license issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Amended by Chapter 94, 2005 General Session

